Washington statutes.
RCW 39.116.030

Specifications for bid or proposal.

By July 1, 2025, and to the extent practicable, specifications for a bid or proposal for a project contract by an awarding authority may only include performance-based specifications for concrete used as a structural material. Awarding authorities may continue to use prescriptive specifications on structural elements to support special designs and emerging technology implementation.

[ 2024 c 344 s 4.]